lt-LT: Sėdynės tipas: Pripildyta oro; Su aukštais ranktūriais (lopšys); Plokščia; Kieta; Tinklelis; Lizdas; Paminkštinta; Užsegama; Supama; Apmušta audiniu; Apmušta audiniu ir paminkštinta; Su apmuštu audiniu dirželiu; Kita
ja: シートタイプ: 空気入り; バケット (クレードル); フラット; ハード; メッシュ; ネスト; パッド入り; ストラップ; スイングバッグ; 布張り; パッド入り布張り; 布張りストラップ; その他
ko: 시트 유형: 공기 충전; 버킷(크래들); 플랫; 하드; 메쉬; 네스트; 패딩; 스트랩; 스윙백; 업홀스터드; 업홀스터드 패딩; 업홀스터드 스트랩; 기타
el: Τύπος καθίσματος: Γεμάτο αέρα; Κάδος (κούνια); Επίπεδη; Σκληρή; Πλέγμα; Φωλιά; Με επένδυση; Λουρί; Περιστρεφόμενη τσάντα; Με ταπετσαρία; Με ταπετσαρία και επένδυση; Λουρί με ταπετσαρία; Άλλο
nb: Setetype: Luftfylt; Bøtte (vugge); Flat; Hard; Mesh; Rede; Polstret; Stropp; Hengepose; Polstret; Polstret vattert; Polstret stropp; Annet
en: Seat type: Air filled; Bucket (cradle); Flat; Hard; Mesh; Nest; Padded; Strap; Swing bag; Upholstered; Upholstered padded; Upholstered strap; Other
de: Sitztyp: Luftgefüllt; Schale; Flach; Hart; Netz; Nest; Gepolstert; Gurt; Hängesessel; Bezogen; Bezogen gepolstert; Bezogen Gurt; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tip scaun: Umplut cu aer; Găleată (leagăn); Plat; Dur; Plasă; Cuib; Căptușit; Curea; Leagăn; Tapițat; Căptușit tapițat; Tapițat cu benzi; Altele
bg-BG: Тип седалка: Пълна с въздух; Кофа (люлка); Плоскa; Твърда; Мрежа; Гнездо; С подплата; Каишка; Люлка; Тапицирана; Тапициран с подплата; Тапицирана презрамка; Други
hu: Ülés típusa: Levegővel töltött; Vödör (bölcső); Lapos; Kemény; Hálós; Fészek; Párnázott; Hevederes; Függő; Kárpitozott; Kárpitozott, párnázott; Kárpitozott, hevederes; Egyéb
zh-TW: 座椅類型: 充氣; 桶式 (籃椅); 平坦; 硬; 網布; 巢狀; 加墊; 綁帶; 鞦韆式; 吊帶; 吊帶軟墊; 吊帶軟墊; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta sedeža: Napolnjen z zrakom; Košara (zibelka); Raven; Trden; Mreža; Viseči gugalni stol; Podloženo; S pasom; Gugalna mreža; Oblazinjen; Oblazinjen podložen; Oblazinjen pas; Drugo
cs: Typ sedáku: Plněné vzduchem; Kbelík (kolébka); Plochý; Tvrdá; Síťovina; Hnízdo; Polstrovaný; Popruhy; Houpací pytel; Čalouněné; Čalouněné polstrované; Čalouněné s popruhy; Jiné
fi: Istuintyyppi: Ilmatäytteinen; Sanko (kehto); Tasainen; Kova; Verkko; Pesä; Pehmustettu; Hihna; Swing-laukku; Verhoiltu; Verhoiltu ja pehmustettu; Verhoiltu kaistale; Muu
th: ประเภทที่นั่ง: เติมลม; ทรงถัง (เปล); ราบ; แข็ง; ตาข่าย; รัง; บุนวม; สายรัด; กระเป๋าสวิง; หุ้มเบาะ; บุนวมแบบหุ้มเบาะ; สายรัดแบบหุ้มเบาะ; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de siège: Gonflable; Siège bébé; Plate; Difficile; A mailles; Suspendu; Rembourré; Avec sangle; Sac à balançoire; Tapissé; Rembourrage tapissé; Sangles pour tapisser; Autre
ru: Тип сиденья: Заполненный воздухом; Корзина (люлька); Плоское; Твердое; Сетка; Гнездо; С подкладкой; С ремешками; Качели; С обивкой; С мягкой обивкой; С обивкой, пристегивающаяся; Другое
sk-SK: Typ sedadla: Naplnený vzduchom; Hojdacie (kresielko); Plochý; Tvrdý; Sieťovina; Hniezdo; Polstrovaný; S popruhmi; Kabelka Swing; Čalúnený; Čalúnený polstrovaný; Čalúnený popruh; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de assento: Enchimento de ar; Balde (berço); Plano; Duro; Rede; Ninho; Almofadada; Alça; Baloiço; Acolchoado; Almofada acolchoada; Alça acolchoada; Outro
da: Sædetype: Luftfyldt; Spand (vugge); Flad; Hård; Mesh; Rede; Polstret; Strop; Svingtaske; Polstret; Polstret med puder; Polstret med strop; Andet
pl: Typ siedziska: Wypełnione powietrzem; Łyżka (łoże); Płaski; Twardy; Siatka; Siedlisko; Wyściałany; Taśma; Worek huśtawkowy; Tapicerowane; Tapicerowane, wyściełane; Pasek tapicerowany; Inne
vi: Loại ghế: Bơm hơi; Dạng xô (cái nôi); Phẳng; Cứng; Lưới; Dạng tổ; Có đệm; Dây đai; Dạng túi treo; Bọc; Bọc có đệm; Dây đeo bọc; Khác
zh-CN: 座椅类型: 充气式; 桶形（摇篮式）; 扁平的; 硬; 网状; 鸟巢状; 带衬垫; 条带; 吊袋; 软垫; 填充软垫; 条带软垫; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de assento: Cheia de ar; Balde (berço); Plana; Duro; Malha; Ninho; Acolchoado; Cinta; Bolsa de balanço; Estofado; Estofado acolchoado; Cinta estofada; Outro
it: Tipo di seduta: Ad aria; Anatomico (culla); Piatto; Dura; Mesh; Nido; Imbottito; Cinghia; Swing bag; Foderato; Imbottito con fodera; Cinghia imbottita; Altro
sv: Sätestyp: Luftfylld; Hink (vagga); Platt; Hård; Mesh; Bo; Vadderad; Rem; Svängväska; Klätt; Klädd vadderad; Klädd rem; Övrigt
nl: Stoeltype: Luchtgevuld; Emmer (wieg); Vlak; Hard; Gaas; Nest; Gewatteerd; Band; Schommelzak; Gestoffeerd; Gestoffeerd gewatteerd; Gestoffeerde riem; Andere
tr: Koltuk Tipi: Hava dolu; Kova (beşik); Düz; Sert; Ağ; Yuva; Yastıklı; Kayış; Salıncak çantası; Döşemeli; Döşemeli yastıklı; Döşemeli kayış; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta sjedala: Punjeno zrakom; Kanta (na stalku); Ravno; Tvrdo; Mrežica; Gnijezdo; Podstavljeno; Na zatezanje; Vreća za ljuljanje; Tapecirano; Tapecirano podstavljeno; Tapecirano vezano; Ostalo
es: Tipo de asiento: Llenos de aire; Cubo (cuna); Puro; Duro; Malla; Nido; Acolchado; Correa; Bolsa de columpio; Tapizado; Tapizado y acolchado; Correa tapizada; Otros